Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
Law reviews.

For article, “Complex Financial Institutions and Systemic Risk,” see 45 Ga. L. Rev. 779 (2011).

For article, “How the Poor Got Cut Out of Banking,” see 62 Emory L.J. 483 (2013).

For article, “Financial Reform’s Internationalism,” see 65 Emory L.J. 1255 (2016).

For article, “Overlapping Legal Rules in Financial Regulation and the Administrative State,”
see 54 Ga. L. Rev. 791 (2020).